Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE B. HEALTH PROGRAMS

Chapter 54, consisting of Secs. 54.001 to 54.002, was added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 88 (S.B. 1249), Sec. 1.

For another Chapter 54, consisting of Secs. 54.001 to 54.011, added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1033 (S.B. 24), Sec. 14, see Sec. 54.001 et seq., post.

CHAPTER 54. LIVING ORGAN DONOR EDUCATION PROGRAM

Sec. 54.001. ESTABLISHMENT OF PROGRAM. The department shall establish a living organ donor education program to educate residents of this state about:

(1) the need for living organ donors, including the particular need for donors from minority populations;

(2) the partnership between the Glenda Dawson Donate Life Texas Registry for deceased organ donation, maintained by Donate Life Texas, and other organ donor registries for living organ donation;

(3) the requirements for registering as a potential living organ donor;

(4) the medical screening and procedures necessary for an individual to be a living organ donor; and

(5) the availability of information about living organ donation in health care facilities, transplant centers, organ procurement organizations, tissue banks, eye banks, and driver's license offices.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 88 (S.B. 1249), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 54.002. INFORMATIONAL MATERIALS. (a) The department, in consultation with Donate Life Texas, shall develop written and electronic informational materials, including links to Internet websites and machine-readable codes, regarding:

(1) living organ donation; and

(2) the process of registering with a living donor registry.

(b) Donate Life Texas may develop and provide the informational materials described by Subsection (a) to the department.

(c) The department and the Department of Public Safety shall post the information described by Subsection (a) on each of the agency's Internet websites.

(d) Appropriate health care facilities, transplant centers, organ procurement organizations, tissue banks, eye banks, and driver's license offices may access the informational materials described by Subsection (a) on the Internet websites of the department and the Department of Public Safety and print the materials to place in their facilities or offices to provide to residents of this state.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 88 (S.B. 1249), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.